Tennessee statutes. Title 63 Professions Of The Healing Arts
Part 4

Treatment Guidelines

63-1-401. Part definitions — Development of recommended treatment guidelines for prescribing opioids — Development of pain clinic guidelines — Study of co-prescription of naloxone with opioid — Review of guidelines — Notification of licensees.

As used in this part:

“Commissioner” means the commissioner of health;

“Pain clinic guidelines” means systematically developed standards to assist healthcare providers and pain clinic certificate holders in making decisions concerning the appropriate medical care for chronic nonmalignant pain treatment, as defined in § 63-1-301; and

“Treatment guidelines” means systematically developed statements to assist healthcare providers in making patient decisions concerning appropriate medical care for specific clinical circumstances and settings.

By January 1, 2016, the commissioner shall develop recommended treatment guidelines for prescribing opioids that can be used by prescribers in this state as a guide for caring for patients. This subsection (b) shall not apply to veterinarians.

By January 1, 2017, the commissioner shall develop recommended pain clinic standards for the operation of a pain management clinic, as defined in § 63-1-301, that can be used by certified pain clinics in this state as a guide for operating a pain clinic. This subsection (c) shall not apply to veterinarians.

By January 1, 2020, the commissioner shall:

Study instances when co-prescribing of naloxone with an opioid is beneficial and publish the results to each prescribing board that licenses healthcare professionals who can legally prescribe controlled substances and to the board of pharmacy; and

Include the findings in the treatment guidelines for prescribing opioids developed pursuant to subsection (b).

The commissioner shall review treatment guidelines and the pain clinic guidelines by September 30 of each year and shall cause these guidelines to be posted on the department's website.

The treatment guidelines shall be submitted to each prescribing board that licenses health professionals who can legally prescribe controlled substances and to the board of pharmacy. Each board shall be charged with reviewing the treatment guidelines and determining how the treatment guidelines should be used by that board's licensees.

The pain clinic guidelines shall be submitted to each board that licenses individuals eligible to hold a pain clinic certificate for review and concurrence.

Each board shall notify all of its licensees through routine bulletins or newsletters of the existence of the guidelines and standards.

Acts 2013, ch. 430, § 2; 2015, ch. 475, § 6; 2019, ch. 327, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2013, ch. 430, § 1 provided that the act, which enacted this part, shall be known and may be cited as the “Addison Sharp Prescription Regulatory Act of 2013.”

Acts 2013, ch. 430, § 11 provided that the department of health, the board of pharmacy or any board operating under title 63, is authorized to use emergency rules under § 4-5-208(a)(5), in order to promulgate any rules required by the act.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment added (d) and redesignated former (d) through (g) as present (e) through (h), respectively.

Effective Dates. Acts 2019, ch. 327, § 2. May 8, 2019.

Law Reviews.

The Right Hammer for the Right Nail: Public Health Tools in the Struggle Between Pain and Addiction, 48 U. Mem. L. Rev. 1300 (Summer 2018).

Defining the Opioid Crisis and the Limited Role of the Criminal Justice System Resolving It, 48 U. Mem. L. Rev. 1206 (Summer 2018).

63-1-402. Prescribers required to hold a current federal DEA license and to complete continuing education — Exceptions to application of part.

On or after July 1, 2014, all prescribers who hold a current federal drug enforcement administration (DEA) license and who prescribe controlled substances shall be required to complete a minimum of two (2) hours of continuing education related to controlled substance prescribing biennially to count toward the licensees' mandatory continuing education.

The continuing education must include instruction in the department's treatment guidelines on opioids, benzodiazepines, barbiturates, and carisoprodol, and may include such other topics as medicine addiction, risk management tools, and other topics as approved by the respective licensing boards.

This section shall not apply to veterinarians, providers practicing at a registered pain management clinic as defined in § 63-1-301 or to medical doctors or osteopathic physicians board certified by the American Board of Medical Specialties (ABMS), or American Osteopathic Association (AOA), or the American Board of Physician Specialties (ABPS) in one (1) or more of the following specialties or subspecialties:

Pain management;

Anesthesiology;

Physical medicine and rehabilitation;

Neurology; or

Rheumatology.

Acts 2013, ch. 430, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2013, ch. 430, § 1 provided that the act, which enacted this part, shall be known and may be cited as the “Addison Sharp Prescription Regulatory Act of 2013.”

Acts 2013, ch. 430, § 11 provided that the department of health, the board of pharmacy or any board operating under title 63, is authorized to use emergency rules under § 4-5-208(a)(5), in order to promulgate any rules required by the act.

Law Reviews.

The Right Hammer for the Right Nail: Public Health Tools in the Struggle Between Pain and Addiction, 48 U. Mem. L. Rev. 1300 (Summer 2018).

Defining the Opioid Crisis and the Limited Role of the Criminal Justice System Resolving It, 48 U. Mem. L. Rev. 1206 (Summer 2018).

63-1-403. Nonresidential buprenorphine treatment guidelines.

As used in this section:

“Commissioners” means the commissioner of mental health and substance abuse services and the commissioner of health; and

“Nonresidential buprenorphine treatment guidelines” means systematically developed standards to assist any practitioners authorized by the state to prescribe buprenorphine-containing products for the treatment of opioid use disorder as defined in the latest version of the Diagnostic and Statistical Manual of Mental Disorders.

By January 1, 2018, the commissioner of mental health and substance abuse services, in collaboration with the commissioner of health, shall develop recommended nonresidential treatment guidelines for the use of buprenorphine that can be used by prescribers in this state as a guide for caring for patients. This subsection (b) shall only apply to practitioners prescribing buprenorphine-containing products for the treatment of opioid use disorder in a nonresidential setting. The guidelines must be consistent with applicable state and federal laws.

Guidelines from nationally recognized organizations, such as the American Society of Addiction Medicine, Substance Abuse and Mental Health Services Administration, and the American Board of Preventative Medicine, must serve as resources in the development of guidelines under this section.

The commissioner of mental health and substance abuse services shall consult with appropriate physicians, alcohol and substance abuse counselors, and other experts to serve as resources in the development of guidelines under this section.

By July 1, 2019, the commissioner of mental health and substance abuse services, in collaboration with the commissioner of health, shall revise the nonresidential buprenorphine treatment guidelines to be consistent with state and federal law and establish protocols for initiating periodic prescriber-initiated-and-led discussions with patients regarding patient readiness to taper down or taper off opioids employed in treatment. The commissioner of mental health and substance abuse services shall consult with appropriate physicians, alcohol and substance abuse counselors, and other experts to serve as resources in the development of guidelines under this subsection (c).

Beginning in 2019, the commissioners shall review the nonresidential buprenorphine treatment guidelines by September 30 of each year and shall cause these guidelines to be posted on both the department of mental health and substance abuse services and the department of health's websites.

The commissioner of mental health and substance abuse services shall submit the nonresidential buprenorphine treatment guidelines to each health-related board that licenses any practitioner authorized by the state to prescribe buprenorphine-containing products for the treatment of an opioid use disorder as defined in the Diagnostic and Statistical Manual of Mental Disorders and to the board of pharmacy.

Each board shall review the nonresidential buprenorphine treatment guidelines and determine how the nonresidential buprenorphine treatment guidelines should be used by that board's licensees.

Each board shall post the nonresidential buprenorphine guidelines and standards on the licensing board's website.

The commissioner of mental health and substance abuse services shall provide a copy of any guidelines developed pursuant to this section and any revision to those guidelines developed pursuant to this section to the chairs of the health committee of the house of representatives and the health and welfare committee of the senate at the time the guidelines or the revisions are posted on websites of the department of mental health and substance abuse services and the department of health.

Acts 2017, ch. 112, § 1; 2018, ch. 978, § 5.

Amendments. The 2018 amendment added present (c) and redesignated former (c)-(e) as present (d)-(f), respectively.

Effective Dates. Acts 2017, ch. 112, § 2. April 7, 2017.

Acts 2018, ch. 978, § 15. July 1, 2018; provided, that for purposes of rulemaking, the act took effect May 21, 2018.